Utah statutes.
32A-1-116 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Purchase of liquor.
(1)  The department may not purchase or stock spirituous liquor in a container
smaller than 200 milliliters except as otherwise allowed by the commission.
(2) (a)  Each order by the department for the purchase of spirituous liquor,
wine, heavy beer, or flavored malt beverage, or any cancellation by the
department of an order for spirituous liquor, wine, heavy beer, or flavored
malt beverage:
(i)  shall be executed in writing by the department; and
(ii)  is not valid or binding unless executed in writing.
(b)  A copy of each order or cancellation shall be kept on file by the
department for at least three years.
(c)  An electronic record satisfies Subsections (2)(a) and (b) pursuant to
Title 46, Chapter 4, Uniform Electronic Transactions Act.
